Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.210

Scope of chapter—Community and technical colleges faculty awards trust program.

With respect to the community and technical colleges faculty awards trust program, the permissible scope of collective bargaining under this chapter shall be governed by RCW 28B.50.843.

[ 1991 c 238 s 155; 1990 c 29 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 29: See note following RCW 28B.50.835.